Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 2 Building Authority Division Act
22-2-108. Powers and duties generally.

As may be provided, allowed, or limited by the provisions of this chapter, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services may establish policies, guidelines, standards, and procedures which shall guide and govern the Building Authority Division with regard to the following responsibilities, duties, powers, and activities:

(1)

To investigate and obtain information concerning the various boards, commissions, authorities, agencies, departments, and offices of the state, which are the “state agencies”, in relation to:

(A)

Where they are housed;

(B)

Their present and projected needs for space and facilities;

(C)

The rental being paid and the rental that state agencies could reasonably pay for space and facilities in public and private buildings; and

(D)

The public building space and facilities that can be feasibly financed from appropriated funds available to the division;

(2)(A)

To construct and equip buildings or to acquire by gift or purchase existing buildings and the sites upon which they are situated for use as public buildings.

(B)

However, before the division may construct and equip buildings or acquire by purchase existing buildings and the sites upon which they are situated for use as public buildings, requests for the construction and equipping of those buildings or the acquisition of those existing buildings shall have been first submitted to the General Assembly, or to the Legislative Council when the General Assembly is not in session, and the General Assembly shall have reviewed and appropriated the funds therefor or specifically approved the method of funding their construction, equipping, or acquisition thereof;

(3)(A)

To provide for the operation and management of the public buildings so constructed or acquired and arrange for the housing of state agencies as space and facilities permit and to rent and lease space and facilities upon such terms and conditions and for such rentals as the division may determine.

(B)

Should there be any surplus space in a public building above the requirements of the state agencies that can be feasibly housed in the building, then the division may lease or rent the surplus space to individuals and organizations other than state agencies until it is needed by state agencies;

(4)

To use the lands acquired by the Arkansas Revenue Department Building Commission which were transferred to State Building Services under Acts 1975, No. 716, § 6, as sites for public buildings and acquire additional sites as provided in §22-2-109;

(5)

To wreck, remove, and dispose of or salvage buildings or other improvements as necessary for the construction and equipping of public buildings or for future use of an unspecified project;

(6)

To purchase, lease, or rent and receive devises, bequests, or donations of and sell or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed, on the division's own behalf and without the approval of any other board, commission, agency, department, or officer, and the division may convert into money any property bequeathed or donated to the division or not needed or which cannot be used in the form received;

(7)(A)

To execute contracts necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, including without limitation a statewide contract for design services to expedite the procurement of design services by a state agency in an emergency.

(B)

However, no contract shall be entered into for the purchase of any real property unless the division submits the contract for review to the General Assembly, or to the Legislative Council when the General Assembly is not in session, a request to purchase the property, and the General Assembly provides the funds for or approves the method of funding the purchase;

(8)

To apply for, receive, accept, and use any moneys and properties from:

(A)

The United States or any state, or any department or agency thereof;

(B)

Any public or private corporation of any nature; and

(C)

Any individual or group;

(9)(A)

To establish, promulgate, and enforce minimum design and construction standards and criteria for all capital improvements undertaken by any state agency, including without limitation procedures regarding flood plain management and the bidding and awarding of capital improvements regarding projects under the jurisdiction of the division.

(B)

However, the division shall not:

(i)

Engage in the production of architectural plans and specifications, with the exception that the architects and engineers employed by the division may provide and make available technical assistance to the division's sections listed in §22-2-107 and other agencies regarding capital improvements involving roofing projects, repairs, alterations, or renovations; or

(ii)

Apply minimum design and construction standards and criteria to the design or construction of an unpaved trail project;

(10)

To establish and enforce minimum standards and criteria for the management, maintenance, and operation of all public buildings and capital improvements;

(11)

To establish and enforce minimum standards and criteria for the leasing and renting of space for and by state agencies;

(12)

To provide for the management, maintenance, and operation of those public buildings as may be required by this chapter or otherwise by law to be managed, maintained, or operated by the division and provide technical advice on management, maintenance, and operation to agencies with existing capital improvements;

(13)

To provide monthly reports to the Legislative Council and to the Governor, or as otherwise may be requested by the Legislative Council, the Governor, or the General Assembly;

(14)

To obtain and keep on file copies of architectural and engineering plans and construction documents for all public buildings and capital improvements, including those plans and documents for all existing public buildings and capital improvements for which plans and documents exist;

(15)(A)(i)

To assume all duties and responsibilities for minor alterations and repairs of existing public buildings and capital improvements previously vested within the Office of State Procurement by Acts 1955, No. 313 [repealed], as amended by Acts 1959, No. 29 [repealed], as implemented and developed by the Construction Section.

(ii)

These duties and responsibilities of the Office of State Procurement are transferred to the division.

(B)

It is the intent of this chapter that the above-mentioned and all other duties and responsibilities of the Construction Section shall be transferred to the division, including approval authority for real property purchases by any agency, board, commission, or department; and

(16)

To promulgate reasonable rules and procedures as may be required to carry out its duties, responsibilities, powers, and authorities under this chapter which are consistent with the purposes and intent of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 3; 1983, No. 734, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1020; Acts 1999, No. 1173, § 2; 2003, No. 364, § 11; 2009, No. 193, § 8; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 26; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 26; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 55; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 55; 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 2; 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2344; 2019, No. 422, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6158.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Acts 2016, No. 240, § 15, provided: “RESTRICTIONS. Department of Finance and Administration — Building Authority Division shall not demolish the 501 Building, formerly known as the Aegon building, but shall retain the building as suitable office space to be used by state agencies, boards, commissions, offices and departments.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment rewrote (2)(B); substituted “in the building” for “therein” in (3)(B); added “or for future use of an unspecified project” at the end of (5); inserted “devises” in (6); rewrote (7)(B) and (8)(B); and made stylistic changes.

The 2003 amendment, in (9)(A), inserted “establish” and added the language beginning “including, but not”; and, in (9)(B), twice substituted “the authority” for “Arkansas State Building Services” and substituted “the authority's” for “Arkansas State Building Services.”

The 2009 amendment, in (9)(A), inserted “flood plain management,” deleted “and suspension and debarment of contractors” following the second instance of “capital improvements,” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 7 and 8 rewrote the introductory language; substituted “the division” for “the authority” throughout (1) through (3), (9), (12), and (15); substituted “State Building Services” for “authority” in (4); substituted “Building Authority Council” for “council” in (6); and rewrote (7)(B).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following the first occurrence of “Administration” in the introductory language; and, in (6), substituted “the division's” for “its”, “division” for “Building Authority Council”, and “the division” for “it”.

The 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 5 and 12 redesignated former (9)(B) as the introductory language of (9)(B) and (9)(B)(i); and added (9)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (16).

The 2019 amendment by No. 422 added “including without limitation a statewide contract for design services to expedite the procurement of design services by a state agency in an emergency” in (7)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in the introductory language, substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” and deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

22-2-109. Acquisition of additional sites.

(a)(1)

Additional sites may be acquired from state agencies, either with or without compensation, by making necessary arrangements with any state agency for any lands owned by that state agency or owned by the State of Arkansas and under the control or jurisdiction of that state agency.

(2)

In the alternative, a site may be obtained by the Building Authority Division by gift, purchase, or, within Pulaski County, Arkansas, by condemnation under the power of eminent domain.

(b)(1)

In the event the sites cannot be purchased by negotiation, the division may institute condemnation proceedings under the power of eminent domain for the acquisition of sites.

(2)(A)

Condemnation proceedings under the power of eminent domain may be exercised within Pulaski County, Arkansas, in the manner now provided in §§18-15-1202 —18-15-1207 or pursuant to any other applicable statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain in the State of Arkansas or by any state agency.

(B)

However, if the division acquires under the power of eminent domain a building which is a general purpose office building located within the Capitol Zoning District, as zoned by §22-3-302(a), the following provisos shall be applicable:

(i)

(a)

In addition to all other elements constituting just compensation for the taking of property, which are usually and regularly considered in condemnation actions, an owner-tenant may be entitled to reasonable moving expenses for the moving of that tenant to a location within Pulaski County, Arkansas.

(b)

The reasonable moving expense shall be fixed by the court and at its discretion;

(ii)

(a)

Upon a final award in such a condemnation proceeding, the court in which the action is being undertaken may grant the condemnee in an owner-occupied structure the right to remain in occupation of the structure without payment of rent by the owner-occupier for a reasonable period of time to be determined in the discretion of the court, but such period of time shall not exceed three (3) years.

(b)

However, if the monetary award is demanded by the condemnee and paid pursuant to the award, the court shall fix a reasonable rental for that part of the property occupied by the condemnee subsequent to the final award. All other tenants occupying all or any part of the condemned premises, by lease or otherwise, shall pay rentals to the condemnor from the date of the final award or payment and so long as such tenants occupy the premises or any part thereof.

(c)

Title to all lands acquired under this chapter shall be taken in the name of the State of Arkansas; and

(iii)

Should the owner of the building being acquired under the power of eminent domain also own unimproved property adjacent to or near the building and should there be a connected or unity of use between the condemned building and the unimproved property, including a parking lot adjacent to or near an office building, the division shall also take by purchase or under the power of eminent domain such unimproved property.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1020; Acts 1999, No. 1173, § 3; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 27; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 27; 2019, No. 910, § 6159.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment by 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “the Arkansas Building Authority” in (a)(2); substituted “division may” for “authority is authorized to” in (b)(1); substituted “if the division acquires” for “in the event the authority shall acquire” in (b)(2)(B); and substituted “division shall” for “authority shall be obliged to” in (b)(2)(B)(iii).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a)(2).

22-2-110. Schedule of supervision generally.

The powers, authorities, and responsibilities of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services relating to the acquisition of properties and to the supervision of all capital improvements, as defined in §22-2-102, shall be in accordance with the schedules of supervision as provided in §§22-2-111 —22-2-113.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1024; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 28; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 28; 2019, No. 910, § 6160.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “the Arkansas Building Authority Council”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.

22-2-111. Schedule of supervision — Type one — Undesignated funds.

From the funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the Building Authority Division not designated to be spent for a particular public building or capital improvement for a particular state agency, the division shall:

(1)(A)

Use the lands acquired by the Arkansas Revenue Department Building Commission which are transferred to State Building Services under Acts 1975, No. 716, § 6, as sites for public buildings and obtain additional sites as provided in this chapter.

(B)(i)

The additional sites may be obtained either with or without compensation by making necessary arrangements with any state agency for any lands owned by the state agency or by the State of Arkansas and under the control or jurisdiction of that state agency.

(ii)

In the alternative, a site may be obtained by the division by gift, purchase, or condemnation under the power of eminent domain at any suitable location.

(C)

In the event the needed sites cannot be purchased by negotiation, the division is authorized to institute condemnation proceedings in Pulaski County, Arkansas, under the power of eminent domain for the acquisition of sites.

(D)

Condemnation proceedings under the power of eminent domain may be exercised within Pulaski County, Arkansas, in the manner now provided by §§18-15-1202 —18-15-1207, or pursuant to any applicable statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain by the State of Arkansas or by any state agency.

(E)

Title to all lands acquired under this chapter shall be taken in the name of the State of Arkansas;

(2)

Construct, repair, renovate, alter, and equip buildings and capital improvements or acquire, by gift or purchase, existing buildings or capital improvements and the sites upon which they are situated for use as public buildings;

(3)(A)

Operate, manage, maintain, and otherwise provide for the operation of the public buildings or capital improvements so constructed or acquired and arrange for the housing of state agencies as space and facilities permit upon such terms and conditions and for such rentals as the division may determine.

(B)

Should there be any surplus space in a public building above the requirements of state agencies that can be feasibly housed in the building, the division may lease or rent the surplus space to individuals and organizations other than state agencies until it is needed by state agencies; and

(4)

Demolish, remove, and dispose of or salvage any buildings or other capital improvements as necessary for the construction and equipping of public buildings or capital improvements.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1024; Acts 1999, No. 1173, § 4; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 29; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 29; 2019, No. 910, § 6161.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment deleted “within Pulaski County, Arkansas” at the end of the introductory paragraph; substituted “Demolish, remove” for “Wreck and remove” at the beginning of (4); and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the division” for “the authority” in the introductory language and throughout (1) and (3); substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the introductory language; and
substituted “State Building Services” for “authority” in (1)(A).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the introductory language.

22-2-112. Schedule of supervision — Type two — Designated funds.

(a)

From the funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the Building Authority Division for the construction or purchase of a particular building or capital improvement which is specifically designated to be purchased, constructed, or improved for a particular state agency, the division shall carry out the powers, authorities, and responsibilities in respect to that construction or purchase as designated in §22-2-111.

(b)

The division shall review and approve architectural and engineering design plans and construction plans to ensure compliance with minimum design and construction standards and criteria promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services pursuant to this chapter.

(c)

The division shall negotiate all contracts for architectural and engineering and construction services and revisions and modifications to those contracts.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1024; Acts 1999, No. 1173, § 5; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 30; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 30; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 56; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 56; 2019, No. 910, § 6162.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the division” for “the authority” throughout; substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority”; and substituted “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration with the advice of the Building Authority” for “Arkansas Building Authority”.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 redesignated the former undesignated paragraph as (a), (b), and (c); and deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following “Administration” in (b).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b).

22-2-113. Schedule of supervision — Type three — All other cases.

(a)

In all other cases, within or without Pulaski County, Arkansas, when the construction of public buildings or capital improvements is undertaken or is presently being undertaken or is authorized but not presently under contract by or for a state agency, then the Building Authority Division shall serve in a technical advisory capacity to advise an agency in relation to that agency's capital improvement and to perform review and approval duties, specifically including, but not limited to, the provision and performance of the following services and duties:

(1)

Consult with the agency as to the need for and the type, cost, and design of the capital improvement;

(2)

Assist the agency in reviewing architectural proposals and advising the agency in the selection of persons to perform architectural and engineering services, but the agency shall have the responsibility of selecting those persons. However, nothing in this subdivision (a)(2) shall affect the power and responsibility of the Building Authority Division to review and approve architectural and engineering design plans and to negotiate contracts for architects' and engineers' services as otherwise provided in this section;

(3)

Review and approve architectural and engineering plans and designs to ensure compliance with minimum design and construction standards and criteria promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services pursuant to this chapter;

(4)

As agent for the state agency, negotiate and approve any contractual terms, relationships, or responsibilities for architectural and engineering services;

(5)

Assist the state agency in receipt of bids for construction contracts necessary for the capital improvement if bids are required by law;

(6)

Advise and assist the agency in the selection of persons to perform construction services, but the agency shall have the responsibility of selecting the persons to perform the services. However, nothing in this subdivision (a)(6) shall affect the powers and responsibilities of the Building Authority Division consistent with subdivisions (a)(7) and (8) of this section;

(7)(A)

Review and approve construction plans to ensure compliance with minimum construction standards and criteria promulgated by the secretary as provided in this chapter.

(B)(i)

This subdivision (a)(7) does not apply to the design or construction of an unpaved trail project.

(ii)

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission shall ensure that an unpaved trail project created under this subdivision (a)(7) meets the standards for observation by registered professionals as established by the Building Authority Division;

(8)(A)

As agent for the agency, negotiate and approve all construction contracts, revisions, and modifications necessary for the capital improvement.

(B)(i)

This subdivision (a)(8) does not apply to the design or construction of an unpaved trail project.

(ii)

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission shall ensure that an unpaved trail project created under this subdivision (a)(8) adheres to applicable public works laws;

(9)

Assist and advise the state agency as to the operation, management, and maintenance of the capital improvement. However, the operation, management, and maintenance shall be in accordance with minimum standards as promulgated by the secretary; and

(10)

Otherwise take such action as may be necessary to carry out the policies, standards, criteria, and other rules as may be adopted or promulgated by the secretary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)(1)

The boards of trustees of the University of Arkansas, Arkansas State University, University of Central Arkansas, Henderson State University, Arkansas Tech University, and Southern Arkansas University, respectively, are exempt from review, consultation, assistance, advice, and approval by the Building Authority Division for those items listed in subsection (a) of this section. Upon approval of the Division of Higher Education, the governing boards of all other public institutions of higher education shall be exempt from review and approval by the Building Authority Division for those items listed in subsection (a) of this section. However, prior to granting such approval, the Division of Higher Education shall have reviewed and approved policies and procedures adopted by the governing board with respect to bidding and construction of capital improvement projects. Nothing in this subdivision (b)(1) shall prevent any of the foregoing institutions exempt from review and approval of the Building Authority Division from entering into an agreement with the Building Authority Division to provide reviews and approval of all items listed in subsection (a) of this section.

(2)

However, any of the foregoing boards which are exempt as set forth in subdivision (b)(1) of this section and which do not enter into an agreement with the Building Authority Division shall adopt policies and procedures involving the bidding and awarding of capital improvement contracts and shall furnish such policies and procedures to the Division of Higher Education for its review and advice. It is the intention of this section that any and all adopted policies and procedures pertaining to the bidding and awarding of capital improvement contracts from public funds as stated herein shall provide a uniformity among the foregoing institutions with respect to the policies and procedures to be followed.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1024; Acts 2001, No. 961, § 9; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 31; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 31; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 57; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 57; 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 3; 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 2345; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6163-6170.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Pursuant to §1-2-303, obsolete language concerning the Building Authority Council has been removed from this section.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment redesignated the former introductory language as the introductory language of (a) and inserted “Arkansas”; substituted “Arkansas Building Authority Council” for “council” in (a)(3); added (b); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the division” for “the authority” throughout the section; substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration with the advice of the Building Authority” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a)(3); inserted “director with the advice of the” in (a)(7), (a)(9), and (a)(10); and substituted “Department of Higher Education” for “department” in the third sentence in (b)(1) and the first sentence in (b)(2).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following “Administration” in (a)(3).

The 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 5 and 12 added (a)(7)(B) and (a)(8)(B); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(10).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “Building Authority Division” for “division” in (a)(2), (a)(6), (a)(7), and throughout (b); substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(3); substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout the section; and substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” throughout (b).